Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-830
Actions taken pursuant to state or federal law; reliance on validity; criminal action; limitation.

No criminal action may be maintained under sections 59-801 to 59-831 against any person, corporation, organization, limited liability company, or association for acting pursuant to and under the authority of any state or federal law. It is the purpose of this section to reaffirm that a person may rely on the validity of any state or federal law until declared invalid.

Laws 1977, LB 524, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 375;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 19.